Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202179-987.01
Contract of employment; contents.

Beginning January 1, 2023, every contract of employment with an employee shall specify (1) the contractual period of employment, including the starting and ending dates of the contract, and (2) that it is subject to the provisions of the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.

Laws 2021, LB147, § 23.
May 27, 2021